hr-HR: Certifikacija medicinskog uređaja: CE; FDA 510(k); Health Canada; ISO 13485; ISO 9001; MDD 93/42/EEC; MDR 2017/745; Ostalo
pl: Certyfikacja urządzenia medycznego: CE; FDA 510(k); Health Canada; ISO 13485; ISO 9001; MDD 93/42/EEC; MDR 2017/745; Inne
cs: Certifikace zdravotnického prostředku: CE; FDA 510(k); Health Canada; ISO 13485; ISO 9001; MDD 93/42/EEC; MDR 2017/745; Jiné
fi: Lääkinnällisen laitteen sertifikaatti: CE; FDA 510(k); Health Canada; ISO 13485; ISO 9001; MDD 93/42/EEC; MDR 2017/745; Muu
lt-LT: Medicinos prietaisų sertifikavimas: CE; FDA 510(k); Health Canada; ISO 13485; ISO 9001; MDD 93/42/EEC; MDR 2017/745; Kita
nl: Medisch hulpmiddelcertificering: CE; FDA 510(k); Health Canada; ISO 13485; ISO 9001; MDD 93/42/EEC; MDR 2017/745; Andere
zh-CN: 医疗器械认证: CE; FDA 510(k); 加拿大卫生部; ISO 13485; ISO 9001; MDD 93/42/EEC; MDR 2017/745; 其他
ro-RO: Certificare dispozitiv medical: CE; FDA 510(k); Health Canada; ISO 13485; ISO 9001; MDD 93/42/EEC; MDR 2017/745; Altele
ko: 의료 기기 인증: CE; FDA 510(k); 캐나다 보건부; ISO 13485; ISO 9001; MDD 93/42/EEC; MDR 2017/745; 기타
sv: Medicinteknisk certifiering: CE; FDA 510(k); Health Canada; ISO 13485; ISO 9001; MDD 93/42/EEC; MDR 2017/745; Övrigt
es: Certificación de dispositivo médico: CE; FDA 510(k); Health Canada; ISO 13485; ISO 9001; MDD 93/42/EEC; MDR 2017/745; Otros
it: Certificazione del dispositivo medico: CE; FDA 510(k); Health Canada; ISO 13485; ISO 9001; MDD 93/42/CEE; MDR 2017/745; Altro
fr: Certification de dispositif médical: CE; FDA 510(k); Santé Canada; ISO 13485; ISO 9001; MDD 93/42/CEE; MDR 2017/745; Autre
en: Medical device certification: CE; FDA 510(k); Health Canada; ISO 13485; ISO 9001; MDD 93/42/EEC; MDR 2017/745; Other
pt-PT: Certificação de dispositivo médico: CE; FDA 510(k); Health Canada; ISO 13485; ISO 9001; MDD 93/42/EEC; MDR 2017/745; Outro
de: Medizinprodukt-Zertifizierung: CE; FDA 510(k); Health Canada; ISO 13485; ISO 9001; MDD 93/42/EEC; MDR 2017/745; Sonstiges
vi: Chứng nhận thiết bị y tế: CE; FDA 510(k); Health Canada; ISO 13485; ISO 9001; MDD 93/42/EEC; MDR 2017/745; Khác
el: Πιστοποίηση ιατρικής συσκευής: CE; FDA 510(k); Health Canada; ISO 13485; ISO 9001; MDD 93/42/EEC; MDR 2017/745; Άλλο
ru: Сертификация медицинского устройства: CE; FDA 510(k); Health Canada; ISO 13485; ISO 9001; MDD 93/42/EEC; MDR 2017/745; Другой
da: Medicinsk udstyrscertificering: CE; FDA 510(k); Health Canada; ISO 13485; ISO 9001; MDD 93/42/EEC; MDR 2017/745; Andet
th: การรับรองอุปกรณ์ทางการแพทย์: ซีอี; เอฟดีเอ 510(เค); เฮลธ์ แคนาดา; ไอเอสโอ 13485; ไอเอสโอ 9001; เอ็มดีดี 93/42/อีอีซี; เอ็มดีอาร์ 2017/745; อื่นๆ
nb: Medisinsk utstyrssertifisering: CE; FDA 510(k); Health Canada; ISO 13485; ISO 9001; MDD 93/42/EØS; MDR 2017/745; Annet
sl-SI: Certifikacija medicinskega pripomočka: CE; FDA 510(k); Health Canada; ISO 13485; ISO 9001; MDD 93/42/EEC; MDR 2017/745; Drugo
pt-BR: Certificação de dispositivo médico: CE; FDA 510(k); Health Canada; ISO 13485; ISO 9001; MDD 93/42/EEC; MDR 2017/745; Outro
hu: Orvostechnikai tanúsítványok: CE; FDA 510(k); Health Canada; ISO 13485; ISO 9001; MDD 93/42/EEC; MDR 2017/745; Egyéb
bg-BG: Сертификация на медицинско устройство: CE; FDA 510(k); Health Canada; ISO 13485; ISO 9001; MDD 93/42/EEC; MDR 2017/745; Други
zh-TW: 醫療器材認證: CE; FDA 510(k); 加拿大衛生部; ISO 13485; ISO 9001; MDD 93/42/EEC; MDR 2017/745; 其他
ja: 医療機器認証: CE; FDA 510(k); ヘルスカナダ; ISO 13485; ISO 9001; MDD 93/42/EEC; MDR 2017/745; その他
sk-SK: Certifikácia zdravotníckej pomôcky: CE; FDA 510(k); Health Canada; ISO 13485; ISO 9001; MDD 93/42/EEC; MDR 2017/745; Iné
tr: Tıbbi cihaz sertifikasyonu: CE; FDA 510(k); Health Canada; ISO 13485; ISO 9001; MDD 93/42/EEC; MDR 2017/745; Diğer